src/morphology/stems/crk-propernouns.lexc
! Copyright © 2015–2018 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

!English names (with English spelling) should be added to 
! giella-shared/eng/src/morphology/stems/eng-propernouns.lexc


LEXICON prop
+N+Prop+Sg: # ;

LEXICON iprop
+N+Prop+Sg:iy # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Obv:îwa # ;

LEXICON ProperNoun-crk
cân prop "John" ;
cân iprop "Johnny" ;
mêr iprop "Mary" ;
Salamô prop ;
Misti-sikâk prop ;
Misti-kiyâsk prop ;
